test/src/morphology/N-aandwks_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - āndõks: # Noun 206 'eng /est anne/fin' - full paradigm
     āndõks+N+Sg+Nom: āndõks
     āndõks+N+Sg+Gen: āndõks
     āndõks+N+Sg+Par: āndõkst
     āndõks+N+Sg+Dat: āndõksõn
     āndõks+N+Sg+Ins: āndõksõks
     āndõks+N+Sg+Ill: āndõksõ
     āndõks+N+Sg+Ela: āndõksõst
     āndõks+N+Pl+Nom: āndõkst
     āndõks+N+Pl+Gen: āndõkst
     āndõks+N+Pl+Par: āndõkši
     āndõks+N+Pl+Dat: āndõkstõn
     āndõks+N+Pl+Ins: āndõkstõks
     āndõks+N+Pl+Ill: āndõkšiz
     āndõks+N+Pl+Ela: āndõkšist
